Mississippi statutes. Title 7. Executive Department
General Provisions

§ 7-1-1.
Installation.

When it shall be ascertained who is chosen governor, he shall be installed and the oath of office administered to him by one of the judges of the supreme court or, in their absence, by the presiding officer of one of the two houses of the legislature, in the presence of the two houses. The time of such installation shall be at noon on the first Tuesday following the ascertaining of who is elected governor, or as soon thereafter as practicable, unless a different time be fixed by a concurrent resolution of the two houses.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 6, art. 3; 1871, § 96; 1880, § 192; 1892, § 2154; 1906, § 2370; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4762; 1930, § 4815; 1942, § 3973.

§ 7-1-3.
Private secretary.

The governor may appoint a private secretary, and such others as are provided by law, for service in his office during his term of office, and they shall be under his direction and control. When necessary during the sitting of the legislature, he may appoint an assistant private secretary, who shall receive four dollars ($4.00) a day payable out of the state treasury upon the certificate of the governor.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 18, art. 5 (4); 1857, ch. 6, art. 6; 1871, § 101; 1880, § 193; 1892, § 2155; 1906, § 2371; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4763; 1930, § 4816; 1942, § 3974.

§ 7-1-5.
Powers generally.

In addition to the powers conferred and duties imposed on the Governor by the constitution and by the laws as elsewhere provided, he shall have the powers and perform the duties following:

He is the supreme executive officer of the state.

He is the commander in chief of the militia of the state and may call out the militia to execute the laws, to suppress insurrections or riots, and to repel invasions.

He shall see that the laws are faithfully executed.

He is to supervise the official conduct of all executive and ministerial officers.

He is to see that all offices are filled and the duties of the offices are performed or, in default thereof, apply such remedy as the law allows; and if the remedy is inadequate, he shall inform the Legislature at its next session.

He shall make appointments and fill vacancies as prescribed by law.

Whenever any suit or legal proceeding is pending that affects the title of the state to any property, or that may result in any claim against the state, he may direct the Attorney General to appear on behalf of the state and protect its interest.

He may require the Attorney General, or district attorney of any district, to inquire into the affairs or management of any corporation existing under the laws of this state, or doing business in this state under the laws of the state.

He may require the Attorney General to aid any district attorney in the discharge of his duties.

He may offer rewards, not exceeding Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00), for persons with mental illness who have escaped and are dangerous, and such other rewards as are authorized by law.

He may require any officer or board to make special reports to him upon demand in writing.

He shall transact all necessary business with state officers, shall require them to be present at their respective offices at all reasonable business hours, and may require information, in writing, from any such officer relating to the duties of his office.

When deemed advisable upon proceedings for the arrest in this state of fugitives from justice from other states or countries, he may commission a special officer to arrest the fugitive in any part of the state.

He may bring any proper suit affecting the general public interests, in his own name for the State of Mississippi, if after first requesting the proper officer so to do, the officer refuses or neglects to do the same.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2156; 1906, § 2372; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4764; 1930, § 4817; 1942, § 3975; Laws, 2008, ch. 442, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2008.

§ 7-1-7.
Acceptance of gifts and bequests.

The governor of the state of Mississippi, in his discretion, is hereby authorized and empowered to receive and accept lands, gifts, and bequests for the state of Mississippi for hospitals and other public purposes for and on behalf of any agency or institution thereof.

The various state agencies and governing boards of institutions of the state of Mississippi are hereby authorized and empowered to take the necessary action required of such boards or agencies in order to make possible the receipt and utilization of any grants, gifts, or bequests to the state for such agency or institutions thereof.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3975.5; Laws, 1954 Ex. ch. 32, §§ 1-3, eff. upon passage, approved Sept. 28, 1954.

§ 7-1-9.
Great seal.

The great seal of the state now in use shall be the seal of the state until altered by the legislature, and all official acts of the governor, his approval or disapproval of bills and resolutions passed by the legislature excepted, shall be authenticated by the great seal of the state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 194; 1892, § 2157; 1906, § 2373; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4765; 1930, § 4818; 1942, § 3976.

§ 7-1-11.
Records of acts and deposit of laws.

The governor shall cause to be recorded in a suitable book to be kept for that purpose the number and title of every act and joint resolution of the legislature presented to him for his approval. Such record shall show the date of the receipt by him of every such act and resolution, the date of his approval thereof in whole or in part, if he approve the same, and the date of his return of any such act or resolution with his objections thereto, if such return thereof be made. He shall cause all acts and joint resolutions which have become laws, or have taken effect by his approval or otherwise, to be deposited in the office of the secretary of state without delay.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2180; 1906, § 2397; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4790; 1930, § 4819; 1942, § 3977.

§ 7-1-13.
Business with the United States government.

The governor shall transact all the business of the state, civil and military, with the United States government or with any other state or territory, except in cases otherwise specially provided by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2181; 1906, § 2398; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4791; 1930, § 4820; 1942, § 3978.

§ 7-1-15.
Transmission of laws and documents.

The governor shall cause to be transmitted to the executive of each state of the United States, to the library of congress, and to the proper authority of the governments of Canada and Mexico, copies of the laws, journals, reports, and documents printed by order of the legislature. He shall receive such books and publications as may be transmitted in return, and cause the same to be deposited in the state library.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 18, art. 8 (1); 1857, ch. 6, art. 8; 1871, § 104; 1880, § 196; 1892, § 2160; 1906, § 2376; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4768; 1930, § 4821; 1942, § 3979.

§ 7-1-17.
Commissioners for other states.

The governor may appoint one or more commissioners, residing in each of the states and territories of the United States and in the District of Columbia or in any foreign country, who shall hold their office for the term of four years from the date of their commissions. They shall have full power to administer oaths and affirmations, to take and certify depositions and affidavits to be used in this state, and to take and certify the acknowledgment and proof of all instruments of writing to be recorded in this state; and their acts shall be as effectual in law as if done and certified by any officer thereunto duly authorized in this state. Before any commissioner so appointed shall proceed to perform any of the duties of his office, he shall take and subscribe an oath, before an officer authorized to administer oaths in the state or county for which such commissioner may be appointed, that he will faithfully discharge all the duties of the office, which oath shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state within six months after the taking and subscribing of the same.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 60, art. 17 (1); 1857, ch. 61, art. 244; 1871, § 800; 1880, § 1640; 1892, § 2181; 1906, 2399; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4792; 1930, § 4822; 1942, § 3980.

§ 7-1-19.
Investigators of crime.

For the purpose of seeing that the laws are faithfully executed and for the purpose of suppressing crimes of violence and acts of intimidation and terror, the governor is hereby authorized to employ such investigators and other qualified personnel as he may deem necessary to make investigation of crimes of violence and acts of terrorism or intimidation, and to aid in the arrest and prosecution of persons charged with such crimes of violence, acts of terrorism or intimidation, or threats of violence. Such investigators and other personnel so employed by the governor shall have full power to investigate, apprehend, and arrest persons committing acts of violence, intimidation, or terrorism anywhere in the state, and shall be vested with the power of police officers in the performance of such duties as set out herein. Such investigators and other personnel shall perform their duties under the direction of the governor. Each such regularly employed investigator shall enter into an official bond in the sum of Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) for the faithful performance of his duties, the bond premiums to be paid by the governor out of the appropriations made for the enforcement of the provisions of Sections 7-1-19 through 7-1-23. Said bonds shall be kept by the governor without a public record of same being required.

The governor shall also be authorized to employ, upon a temporary basis from time to time, such additional investigators and other personnel as he may deem necessary to carry out the purposes of the cited sections, who may not be required to give bond.

The governor shall be authorized to offer and pay suitable rewards to other persons for aiding in such investigation and in the apprehension and conviction of persons charged with acts of violence, or threats of violence, or intimidation, or acts of terrorism.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3980.5; Laws, 1947, 2nd Ex. ch. 2, §§ 1-4.

§ 7-1-21.
Powers and duties of investigators of crime.

Investigators and other personnel, employed by the governor pursuant to Section 7-1-19, shall have full power to investigate, apprehend, or arrest any person, firm, corporation, or any combination or conspiracy thereof committing said acts of violence, or threats of violence, or intimidations, or acts of terror, or damaging, injuring, or destroying property as a result of acts of violence or terror, in any manner whatever, and to help indict or prosecute, or both, in all such cases. Such investigators or other personnel so employed by the governor, in the performance of their duties under Sections 7-1-19 through 7-1-23, are authorized and empowered to carry firearms and to serve warrants and subpoenas issued under the authority of the state of Mississippi; to make arrests without warrant in such cases where the person making the arrest has reasonable grounds to believe that the person so arrested is guilty of any of the offenses herein named and there is a likelihood of the person escaping before a warrant can be obtained for his arrest, but the person arrested shall be immediately taken before a committing officer; to acquire, collect, classify, and preserve records and evidence obtained hereunder; and to make all lawful searches and seizures to obtain evidence of such acts, when based upon reasonable grounds or probable cause that such is necessary in the accomplishment of the purposes of the aforesaid sections.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3980.5; Laws, 1947, 2nd Ex. ch. 2, §§ 1-4.

§ 7-1-23.
Compensation of investigators of crime.

The governor shall fix the compensation and travel and expense allowances to be paid investigators and other persons employed under the provisions of Sections 7-1-19 through 7-1-23, and shall furnish such investigators with such weapons, equipment, materials, articles, and supplies as may be necessary, suitable, and desirable to enable such investigators and other persons to discharge and carry out the duties imposed on them under the provisions of said sections. All expenses incurred hereunder shall be paid out of such funds as are specifically appropriated for the purposes hereof.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3980.5; Laws, 1947, 2nd Ex. ch. 2, §§ 1-4.

§ 7-1-25.
Arrest and delivery of fugitives from justice.

It shall be the duty of the governor, on demand made by the executive authority of any other state, territory or district for any person charged, on affidavit or indictment in such other state, territory or district, with a criminal offense and who shall have fled from justice and be found in this state, the demand being accompanied with a copy of the affidavit or indictment certified as authentic by such executive authority, to cause the offender to be arrested and delivered up to the authority of such state, territory or district for removal to the jurisdiction having cognizance of the offense, upon payment of the costs and expenses consequent on arrest; and it shall be the duty of the governor to demand and receive fugitives from justice for offenses committed in this state.

The governor may also surrender, on demand of the executive authority of any other state, any person to be found in this state who stands charged in the manner provided in subsection (1) of this section with committing an act in this state, or in a third state, intentionally resulting in a crime in the state whose executive authority is making the demand.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 64, art. 361; 1871, § 2868; 1880, § 198; 1892, § 2162; 1906, § 2378; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4770; 1930, § 4823; 1942, § 3981; Laws, 1983, ch. 389, eff from and after July 1, 1983.

§ 7-1-27.
Duty to notify executive of other state.

Upon being informed by any conservator of the peace of the commitment or admission to bail of any person in this state charged with treason, felony, or other crime in some other state or territory, the governor shall forthwith communicate the information to the executive of the state or territory in which the offense is charged to have been committed.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 3123; 1892, § 2163; 1906, § 2379; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4771; 1930, § 4824; 1942, § 3982.

§ 7-1-29.
Rewards for absconding criminals.

Whenever the governor shall be of opinion that the public good requires it, he is authorized to offer, by proclamation or in such other manner as he may deem advisable, such reward as he may think the nature of the case requires, not exceeding Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00), for the apprehension and arrest of any person who has committed any atrocious offense against the criminal laws, to be paid in no instance until the offender is delivered to the civil authority of the county where the offense was committed, and confined in jail or admitted to bail; or the reward may be conditioned to be paid only upon conviction.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2164; 1906, § 2380; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4772; 1930, § 4825; 1942, § 3983.

§ 7-1-31.
Agent to bring absconding offender from other states.

The governor may appoint an agent to demand of the executive authority of any other state or territory any fugitive from justice or other person charged with treason, felony, or other crime in this state. Such agent, if necessary, may employ a sufficient guard or escort to bring such criminal to this state; and the governor may contract other expenses absolutely required in performing the duties of the agency.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2165; 1906, § 2381; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4773; 1930, § 4826; 1942, § 3984.

§ 7-1-33.
Suits in foreign jurisdiction.

The governor may order and direct suits to be brought for and in the name of the state in any other state or foreign jurisdiction for the recovery of any moneys due or owing to the state, or upon any claim or demand on which the state is entitled to sue. For the prosecution of such suits he may employ counsel and, for such sum as is necessary to pay the costs or expenses thereof, order the auditor to draw a warrant on the treasury, payable out of any sum appropriated for the purpose.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2167; 1906, § 2383; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4775; 1930, § 4827; 1942, § 3985.

§ 7-1-35.
Appointment of officers.

The governor shall fill by appointment, with the advice and consent of the senate, all offices subject to such appointment when the term of the incumbent will expire within nine months after the meeting of the legislature, and also vacancies in such offices occurring from any cause during the session of the senate or during the vacation of that body. All such appointments to offices made in vacation shall be reported to the senate within ten days after the commencement of the session of that body for its advice and consent to the appointment, and the vacancy shall not be filled if caused by the senate’s refusal to confirm any appointment or nomination, or if it do not occur during the last five days of the session, by the appointment of the governor in the vacation of the senate, without its concurrence. Any appointment in vacation to which the senate shall refuse to consent shall be thereby annulled from that date, but the acts of the appointee prior thereto shall not be affected thereby.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1871, § 106; 1880, § 199; 1892, § 2168; 1906, § 2384; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4776; 1930, § 4828; 1942, § 3986; Laws, 1886, p. 161.

§ 7-1-37.
Senate convened in vacation of legislature.

The governor may convene the senate in the vacation of the legislature for concurrence in appointments by giving ten days’ notice thereof by proclamation by mail to each of the senators.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 200; 1892, § 2169; 1906, § 2386; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4778; 1930, § 4829; 1942, § 3987.

§ 7-1-39.
Vacancies in municipal elective offices.

In the event of the death, resignation, or removal from office of the mayor and board of aldermen or commissioners, or a majority of the aldermen or commissioners, so that said vacancies cannot be filled as now provided by law, it shall be the duty of the governor to fill such vacancies by appointment for the unexpired term where such unexpired term is less than six months, and if more than six months, until an election can be held as now provided by law to fill such vacancies.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 4830; 1942, § 3988; Laws, 1926, ch. 269.

§ 7-1-41.
Superintendent of auditor’s and treasurer’s offices.

The governor shall superintend the offices of the treasurer and auditor of public accounts, and may at any time make a personal inspection of all the books, vouchers, and other official papers in said offices. If he shall at any time discover or have reason to suspect that either of said officers has been guilty of any embezzlement, peculation, defalcation, or fraud in his office, he shall forthwith suspend said officer from office and shall cause legal proceedings to be instituted against him. He shall make a temporary appointment to fill such office until the officer so suspended shall be acquitted of the charge against him, and the officer so suspended shall not receive any salary during the period of his suspension, unless he shall be acquitted.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 18, art. 5 (6); 1857, ch. 6, art. 7; 1871 § 103; 1880, § 195; 1892, § 2158; 1906, § 2374; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4766; 1930, § 4832; 1942, § 3990; Laws, 1978, ch. 458, § 6, eff from and after January 1, 1980.

§ 7-1-43.
To verify funds in the treasury.

It shall be the duty of the governor, at least three times a year and oftener if he sees fit, at such times as he may deem proper, to go to the treasury without giving notice to the treasurer, to verify the cash balance as shown by the books, and to publish the fact that he has done so, stating whether the amount called for by the books be actually in the treasury and whether the treasurer had any notice whatever that the verification would be made. He shall verify the count of the funds in the treasury and certify to the statements of the treasurer, if true, showing the condition of the treasury in the months of January and July of each year, as required by section 137 of the constitution.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2159; 1906, § 2375; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4767; 1930, § 4833; 1942, § 3991.

§ 7-1-45.
Examiner of public accounts.

The governor is authorized, when he deems it proper, to appoint an expert accountant whose duty it shall be, under the direction of the governor, to audit and examine the books, accounts, and vouchers of all officers, state or county, or of any of the state educational, charitable, or reformatory institutions, or of the officers thereof, or of any other institution supported in whole or in part by the state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2171; 1906, § 2388; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4780; 1930 § 4834; 1942, § 3992.

§ 7-1-47.
Compensation of examiner of public accounts.

The governor shall have power to direct and control the examiner and, when he deems it necessary, may require him to examine the accounts of any state or county officer charged with the duty of collecting or disbursing any part of the public revenue. He shall fix compensation at not exceeding seven dollars a day while actually employed, the examiner to pay his own expenses; and the governor shall prescribe the time for which he shall be employed.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2172; 1906, § 2389; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4781; 1930, § 4835; 1942, § 3993.

§ 7-1-49.
Commission of examiner of public accounts.

A commission shall issue to the examiner, vesting in him authority to do and perform the duties for which he may be appointed. He shall have authority to issue subpoenas for witnesses whom he may wish to examine, administer oaths to them, and to compel their attendance; and shall have full authority to require officers whose books and accounts are being examined, and their deputies and clerks, to render him assistance and give him information needed in the prosecution of his investigations. The examiner shall have the same power to punish a witness who fails or refuses to attend and testify before him as conferred by law on justices of the peace; and an officer, his deputy or clerk, failing to give assistance or information to the examiner when required shall be punished as for a failure or refusal to perform official duty.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2173; 1906, § 2390; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4782; 1930, § 4836; 1942, § 3994.

§ 7-1-51.
Special audit of county books.

Where an expert accountant is appointed by the governor to audit the books and accounts of county officers of any county and the accountant so appointed shall perform services under such appointment in auditing the books of any county officers, such accountant shall submit his bill for services, itemized, to the circuit judge of the district, whose duty it shall be to approve the same if found correct and reasonable. Thereupon said account, with a copy of the order of the judge or court, shall be sent to the governor for his approval, who, if he shall find the same correct and reasonable, shall approve the same; and thereupon it shall be the duty of the board of supervisors of the county, the books of whose offices are audited, to allow said account. The clerk of the board shall then issue a warrant for the same on the county depository as in other cases, provided that this section shall apply only to cases where the governor has been petitioned by 25 per cent of the qualified electors of the county to appoint an accountant.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 4783; 1930, § 4837; 1942, § 3995; Laws, 1914, ch. 241.

§ 7-1-53.
Appointment revocable.

The appointment of the examiner is revocable at the discretion of the governor, and the governor may at pleasure appoint a successor. If the exigencies of the public service require it, the governor may appoint two or more examiners.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2174; 1906, § 2391; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4784; 1930, § 4838; 1942, § 3996.

§ 7-1-55.
Examiner’s report.

The examiner shall make report to the governor, under oath, of the result of any examination he may be required to make, and show therein the true condition and state of the books and accounts examined at the time of his examination. Such reports shall be public records.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2175; 1906, § 2392; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4785; 1930, § 4839; 1942, § 3997.

§ 7-1-57.
Defaulting state treasurer and tax collectors suspended.

Whenever it shall be credibly alleged to the governor that the state treasurer or any tax collector is a defaulter, the governor shall direct the examiner forthwith to examine the records, books, and accounts of such treasurer or tax collector and, as soon as practicable, to report the condition of such officer’s accounts. If the report show such officer to be a defaulter or short in his accounts, the governor shall at once suspend him and appoint some other person to perform the duties of the office pending the investigation of his account.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2176; 1906, § 2393; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4786; 1930, § 4840; 1942, § 3998.

§ 7-1-59.
Court proceedings to be instituted.

If the examiner report the state treasurer or any tax collector to be a defaulter, it shall be the duty of the governor to notify the attorney general in case of the state treasurer, or the proper district attorney in case of a county officer, of the facts and require him to institute proper proceedings in court for the investigation of such account and the judicial determination of the status thereof.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2177; 1906, § 2394; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4787; 1930, § 4841; 1942, § 3999.

§ 7-1-61.
Duty in respect to defaulter.

The governor shall have the power, and it is his duty, to suspend alleged defaulting tax collectors pending the investigation of their respective accounts, whether made under the foregoing sections or otherwise, and to make temporary appointments of proper persons to fill the offices while such investigations are being made.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2170; 1906, § 2387; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4779; 1930, § 4842; 1942, § 4000.

§ 7-1-63.
Contingent fund.

The executive contingent fund shall be expended under the direction of the governor and be accounted for by him to the legislature at each session. The auditor shall issue his warrant on the treasurer for such sums as the governor may from time to time, by his written order, direct; but no part of such fund shall be expended for the private purposes of the governor or for his individual expenses.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 18, art. 6; 1857, ch. 6, art. 9; 1871, § 105; 1880, § 197; 1892, § 2161; 1906, § 2377; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4769; 1930, § 4843; 1942, § 4001.

§ 7-1-65.
To borrow money in case of casualties.

The governor is authorized, in case of casualty or casualties caused by wind, fire, or water leaving people distressed and in destitute circumstances, to borrow money in sums not exceeding Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) in any one case, and to expend the same for the relief of such suffering and on such terms and conditions as he may see fit and proper. There may not be borrowed in any one year more than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00).

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 4794, 4795; 1930, § 4844; 1942, § 4002; Laws, 1910, ch. 181.

§ 7-1-67.
Acting governor in certain contingencies.

When the office of governor shall become vacant, by death or otherwise, the lieutenant-governor shall possess the powers and discharge the duties of said office. When the governor shall be absent from the state or unable from protracted illness to perform the duties of the office, the lieutenant-governor shall discharge the duties of said office until the governor be able to resume his duties. If, from disability or otherwise, the lieutenant-governor shall be incapable of performing said duties or if he be absent from the state, the president of the senate pro tempore shall act in his stead; but if there be no such president or if he be disqualified by like disability or be absent from the state, then the speaker of the house of representatives shall assume the office of governor and perform said duties. In case of the inability of the foregoing officers to discharge the duties of governor, the secretary of state shall convene the senate to elect a president pro tempore. The officer discharging the duties of governor shall receive compensation as such. Should a doubt arise as to whether a vacancy has occurred in the office of governor, or as to whether any one of the disabilities mentioned in this section exists or shall have ended, then the secretary of state shall submit the question in doubt to the judges of the supreme court, who, or a majority of whom, shall investigate and determine said question and furnish to the secretary of state an opinion in writing, which shall be final and conclusive.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 201; 1892, § 2183; 1906, § 2400; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4793; 1930, § 4848; 1942, § 4003.